test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/N-I-D-mêstakay-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mêstakay - ok : # -m inanimate dependent noun, hair    AEW V-initial NDI2
     mêstakay+N+A+Sg: mêstakay
     mêstakay+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nêstakay
     mêstakay+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kêstakay
     mêstakay+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nêstakânân
     mêstakay+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: kêstakânaw
     mêstakay+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kêstakâwâw

     mêstakay+N+A+Pl: mêstakaya
     mêstakay+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nêstakaya
     mêstakay+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kêstakaya
     mêstakay+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nêstakânâna
     mêstakay+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: kêstakânawa
     mêstakay+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kêstakâwâwa

     mêstakay+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: wêstakaya
     mêstakay+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: wêstakâwâwa
     mêstakay+N+A+Px4Sg+Obv: wêstakâyiwa
     mêstakay+N+A+Px4Pl+Obv: wêstakâyiwa

     mêstakay+N+A+Loc: mêstakâhk
     mêstakay+N+A+Px1Sg+Loc: nêstakâhk
     mêstakay+N+A+Px2Sg+Loc: kêstakâhk
     mêstakay+N+A+Px1Pl+Loc: nêstakânâhk
     mêstakay+N+A+Px12Pl+Loc: kêstakânâhk
     mêstakay+N+A+Px2Pl+Loc: kêstakâwâhk
     mêstakay+N+A+Px3Sg+Loc: wêstakâhk
     mêstakay+N+A+Px3Pl+Loc: wêstakâwâhk
     mêstakay+N+A+Px4Sg+Loc: wêstakâyihk
     mêstakay+N+A+Px4Pl+Loc: wêstakâyihk

     mêstakay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: mêstakâs
     mêstakay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [mêstakâs, mêstakâsis]
     mêstakay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nêstakâs, nêstakâsis]
     mêstakay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kêstakâs, kêstakâsis]
     mêstakay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [nêstakâsinân, nêstakâsisinân]
     mêstakay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: [kêstakâsinaw, kêstakâsisinaw]
     mêstakay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kêstakâsiwâw, kêstakâsisiwâw]

     mêstakay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [mêstakâsa, mêstakâsisa]
     mêstakay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [nêstakâsa, nêstakâsisa]
     mêstakay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kêstakâsa, kêstakâsisa]
     mêstakay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [nêstakâsinâna, nêstakâsisinâna]
     mêstakay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: [kêstakâsinawa, kêstakâsisinawa]
     mêstakay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kêstakâsiwâwa, kêstakâsisiwâwa]
